Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 646A.572 is amended to read:
646A.572. (1) (a) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 apply to any person that conducts business in this
state, or that provides products or services to residents  of this state, and that during a calendar
year, controls or processes:
[(a)] (A)  The personal data of 100,000 or  more consumers, other than personal data controlled
or processed solely for the purpose of completing a payment transaction; or
[(b)] (B)  The personal data of 25,000 or more consumers, while deriving 25 percent  or more of
the person’s annual gross revenue from selling personal data.
(b) Notwithstanding the  threshold numbers specified in paragraph (a)(A) and (B) of this
subsection for the application of ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589, and subject to the  exemptions set
forth in subsections (2) and (3) of this section,  ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 apply to a motor
vehicle manufacturer and any  affiliate of a motor vehicle manufacturer that controls or
processes any personal data obtained from a consumer’s use of a motor vehicle  or any
component of a motor vehicle.
(2) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 do not apply to:
(a) A public corporation, including the Oregon Health and  Science University and the Oregon
State Bar, or a public body, as defined in ORS 174.109;
(b) Protected health information that  a covered entity or business associate processes in ac-
cordance with, or documents that a covered  entity or business associate creates for the purpose of
complying with, the Health  Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996, P.L. 104-191, and
regulations promulgated under the Act, as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(c) Information used  only for public health activities and purposes described in 45 C.F.R. 164.512,
as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(d) Information that identifies a consumer in connection with:
(A) Activities that are subject to the Federal Policy for the Protection of Human Subjects,
codified as 45  C.F.R. part 46 and in various other federal regulations, as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(B) Research on human subjects undertaken  in accordance with good clinical practice guidelines
issued by the International Council for Harmonisation of Technical Requirements for Pharmaceu-
ticals for Human Use;
Enrolled House Bill 3875 (HB 3875-INTRO) Page 1
(C) Activities that are subject  to the protections provided in 21 C.F.R. parts 50 and 56, as in
effect on January 1, 2024; or
(D) Research conducted in accordance with the requirements set forth  in subparagraphs (A) to
(C) of this paragraph or otherwise in accordance with applicable law;
(e) Patient identifying information, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 2.11, as in effect on January 1, 2024,
that is collected and processed in accordance with 42 C.F.R. part 2;
(f) Patient safety work  product, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 3.20, as in effect on January 1, 2024, that
is created for purposes of improving patient safety under 42 C.F.R. part 3;
(g) Information and documents created for  the purposes of the Health Care Quality Improvement
Act of 1986, 42 U.S.C. 11101 et seq., and implementing regulations, both as in effect on January  1,
2024;
(h) Information that originates from, or that is intermingled so as  to be indistinguishable from,
information described in paragraphs  (b) to (g) of this subsection that a covered entity or business
associate,  or  a program of a qualified service organization, as defined in 42 C.F.R. 2.11, as in effect
on January 1, 2024, creates, collects, processes, uses or maintains in the  same manner as is required
under the laws, regulations and guidelines described in paragraphs (b) to (g) of this subsection;
(i) Information processed or maintained solely in connection with, and for the  purpose of, ena-
bling:
(A) An individual’s employment or application for employment;
(B) An individual’s ownership of, or function as a director or officer of, a business entity;
(C) An individual’s contractual relationship with a business entity;
(D) An individual’s receipt  of benefits from an employer, including benefits for the individual’s
dependents or beneficiaries; or
(E) Notice of an emergency to persons that an individual specifies;
(j) Any activity that involves collecting, maintaining, disclosing, selling, communicating  or using
information for the purpose of evaluating  a consumer’s creditworthiness, credit standing, credit ca-
pacity, character, general reputation, personal characteristics or mode of living if  done strictly in
accordance with the provisions of the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681 et seq., as  in effect
on January 1, 2024, by:
(A) A consumer reporting agency, as  defined in 15 U.S.C. 1681a(f), as in effect on January 1,
2024;
(B) A person who furnishes information to a consumer reporting agency  under 15 U.S.C. 1681s-2,
as in effect on January 1, 2024; or
(C) A person who uses a consumer report as provided in 15 U.S.C. 1681b(a)(3);
(k) Information collected,  processed, sold or disclosed under and in accordance with the follow-
ing federal laws, all as in effect on January 1, 2024:
(A) The Gramm-Leach-Bliley Act, P.L. 106-102, and regulations adopted to implement that Act;
(B) The Driver’s Privacy Protection Act of 1994, 18 U.S.C. 2721 et seq.;
(C) The Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act,  20 U.S.C. 1232g and regulations adopted
to implement that Act; and
(D) The  Airline Deregulation Act, P.L. 95-504, only to the extent that an air carrier collects
information related to prices, routes or services and only to the extent that the provisions of the
Airline Deregulation Act preempt ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589;
(L) A financial  institution, as defined in ORS 706.008, or a financial institution’s affiliate or
subsidiary that  is only and directly engaged in financial activities, as described in 12 U.S.C. 1843(k),
as in effect on January 1, 2024;
(m) Information that  originates from, or is intermingled so as to be indistinguishable from, in-
formation described in paragraph (k)(A) of this subsection  and that a licensee, as defined in ORS
725.010, collects, processes, uses or maintains in the same manner as is required under the laws  and
regulations specified in paragraph (k)(A) of this subsection;
Enrolled House Bill 3875 (HB 3875-INTRO) Page 2
(n) An insurer, as defined  in ORS 731.106, other than a person that, alone or in combination
with another person, establishes and maintains  a self-insurance program and that does not otherwise
engage in the business of entering into policies of insurance;
(o) An insurance producer, as defined in ORS 731.104;
(p) An insurance consultant, as defined in ORS 744.602;
(q) A person that holds a third party administrator license issued under ORS 744.710;
(r) A nonprofit organization  that is established to detect and prevent fraudulent acts in con-
nection with insurance; and
(s) Noncommercial activity of:
(A) A publisher, editor, reporter  or other person who is connected with or employed by a
newspaper, magazine, periodical, newsletter,  pamphlet, report or other publication in general circu-
lation;
(B) A  radio or television station that holds a license issued by the Federal Communications
Commission;
(C) A nonprofit organization that provides programming to radio or television networks; or
(D) An entity that provides an  information service, including a press association or wire service.
(3) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 do not prohibit a controller or processor from:
(a) Complying with federal, state or local statutes, ordinances, rules or regulations;
(b) Complying with a federal, state or  local governmental inquiry, investigation, subpoena or
summons related to a civil, criminal or administrative proceeding;
(c) Cooperating with a law enforcement agency  concerning conduct or activity that the con-
troller or processor  reasonably and in good faith believes may violate federal, state or local statutes,
ordinances, rules or regulations;
(d) Investigating, establishing, initiating or defending legal claims;
(e) Preventing, detecting, protecting against or  responding to, and investigating, reporting or
prosecuting persons responsible for, security  incidents, identity theft, fraud, harassment or mali-
cious, deceptive or illegal activity or preserving the integrity or security of systems;
(f) Identifying and repairing technical errors in a controller’s or processor’s  information systems
that impair existing or intended functionality;
(g) Providing a product or service that a consumer specifically requests from the controller  or
processor or requests as the parent or guardian  of a child on the child’s behalf or as the guardian
or conservator of a  person subject to a guardianship, conservatorship or other protective arrange-
ment on the person’s behalf;
(h) Negotiating, entering into or performing a contract with a consumer,  including fulfilling the
terms of a written warranty;
(i) Protecting any person’s health and safety;
(j) Effectuating a product recall;
(k) Conducting internal research  to develop, improve or repair products, services or technology;
(L) Performing internal operations  that are reasonably aligned with a consumer’s expectations,
that the consumer may reasonably anticipate based on the consumer’s existing relationship with the
controller  or  that are otherwise compatible with processing data for the purpose of providing a
product or service the consumer  specifically requested or for the purpose of performing a contract
to which the consumer is a party; or
(m) Assisting another controller or processor with any of the activities set forth in this sub-
section.
(4) ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 do not apply to the extent that a controller’s or processor’s  com-
pliance with ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589 would violate an evidentiary privilege under  the laws of this
state. Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 646A.570 to 646A.589, a  controller or processor may
provide personal data about a consumer in a  privileged communication to a person that is covered
by an evidentiary privilege under the laws of this state.
Enrolled House Bill 3875 (HB 3875-INTRO) Page 3
(5) A controller may process personal data in  accordance with subsection (3) of this section only
to the extent  that the processing is adequate and reasonably necessary for, relevant to, propor-
tionate in relation to and limited to the purposes set forth in this section.
(6) Collection, use and retention of personal data under subsection (3)(e) and (f) of  this section
must, where applicable, take into account the nature and purpose of the  collection, use or retention.
The personal data must be subject to reasonable administrative,  technical and physical measures to
protect the confidentiality, integrity and security of the personal data  and reduce reasonably fore-
seeable risks of harm to consumers from the collection, use or retention.
(7) A controller that claims that the controller’s  processing of personal data is exempt under
subsection (3) of this section has the burden of demonstrating that the controller’s  processing qual-
ifies for the exemption and complies with  the requirements of subsections (5) and (6) of this section.
SECTION 2. This 2025 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date  on which the 2025
regular session of the Eighty-third Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House April 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 15, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3875 (HB 3875-INTRO) Page 4